Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.185.050

Program review and monitoring—Reports to the legislature—Public access to demographic data—Rules.

(1) In order to ensure that school districts are meeting the requirements of an approved program for highly capable students, the superintendent of public instruction shall monitor highly capable programs at least once every five years. Monitoring shall begin during the 2002-03 school year.

(2) Any program review and monitoring under this section may be conducted concurrently with other program reviews and monitoring conducted by the office of the superintendent of public instruction. In its review, the office shall monitor program components that include but need not be limited to the process used by the district to identify and reach out to highly capable students with diverse talents and from diverse backgrounds, assessment data, other indicators to determine how well the district is meeting the academic needs of highly capable students, and district expenditures used to enrich or expand opportunities for these students.

(3) Beginning June 30, 2003, and every five years thereafter, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall submit a report to the education committees of the house of representatives and the senate that provides the following:

(a) A brief description of the various instructional programs offered to highly capable students; and

(b) Relevant data to the programs for highly capable students collected under RCW 28A.300.042.

(4) Beginning November 1, 2023, and annually thereafter, the superintendent of public instruction must make data publicly available that includes a comparison of the race, ethnicity, and low-income status of highly capable students compared to the same demographic groups in the general student population of each school district. Reporting must also include comparisons for students who are English language learners, have an individualized education program, have a 504 plan, are covered by provisions of the McKinney-Vento homeless assistance act, or are highly mobile.

(5) The superintendent of public instruction may adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW to implement this section.

[ 2023 c 265 s 5; 2002 c 234 s 1.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2023 c 265: See note following RCW 28A.185.020.